Florida, session 2026, SB664.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSubsection (4) is added to section 83.46, 13 Florida Statutes, to read: 14 83.46âRent; duration of tenancies.â 15 (4)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the term: 16 1.ââAffordableâ has the same meaning as in s. 420.0004. 17 2.ââBase rentâ means the initial rent for a dwelling unit 18 charged by a landlord which is calculated based on a formula 19 dictated by an affordable housing program using the most recent 20 publication of the United States Department of Housing and Urban 21 Developmentâs Area Median Income; based on reasonable rent 22 calculated by a public housing agency; or otherwise based on the 23 terms of the affordable housing program. Base rent applies 24 before deduction of monthly housing assistance payments to 25 calculate a monthly net rent payable by the tenant. 26 (b)âA person who is a landlord of a dwelling unit that 27 qualifies as affordable housing and who has received federal, 28 state, or local funding or tax incentives because of the 29 dwelling unitâs status as an affordable housing unit may not 30 increase the base rent of the dwelling unit during the term of a 31 rental agreement. 32 (c)âThis subsection does not prohibit a landlord from 33 increasing the base rent of a dwelling unit that qualifies as 34 affordable housing when a tenant is renewing his or her rental 35 agreement, nor does it prohibit changes to the net rent based on 36 changes to the tenantâs qualifications for a housing assistance 37 program under the terms of such affordable housing program. 38 (d)âThis subsection applies to rental agreements that have 39 a term of 13 months or less and are entered into on or after 40 July 1, 2027. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.